sv: Elektronik > Ljud > Ljudkomponenter > Ljudsändare: Bluetooth-sändare; FM-sändare
ru: Электроника > Аудиотехника > Компоненты аудиосистем > Передатчики звуковых сигналов: Bluetooth-передатчики; FM-передатчики
it: Elettronica > Audio > Componenti audio > Trasmettitori audio: Trasmettitori Bluetooth; Trasmettitori FM
da: Elektronik > Lyd > Lydkomponenter > Lydsendere: Bluetooth-sendere; FM-sendere
pl: Elektronika > Audio > Elementy audio > Transmitery audio: Transmitery Bluetooth; Transmitery FM
hu: Elektronika > Hang > Hangkomponensek > Hangadók: Bluetooth-adók; FM-adók
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > เสียง > ส่วนประกอบทางเสียง > เครื่องส่งสัญญาณเสียง: เครื่องส่งสัญญาณบลูทูธ; เครื่องส่งสัญญาณ FM
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 音频 > 音频组件 > 音频收发器: 蓝牙发射器; FM 调频发射器
nb: Elektronikk > Lyd > Lydkomponenter > Lydsendere: Bluetoothsendere; FM-sendere
ro-RO: Electronice > Audio > Componente audio > Transmițătoare audio: Transmițătoare Bluetooth; Transmițătoare FM
fr: Appareil électronique > Audio > Composants audio > Transmetteurs audio: Transmetteurs Bluetooth; Émetteurs FM
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 音訊設備 > 音訊元件 > 音訊發射器: 藍牙發射器; FM 發射器
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Áudio > Componentes áudio > Transmissores áudio: Transmissores Bluetooth; Transmissores FM
sl-SI: Elektronika > Avdio > Avdio komponente > Zvočni oddajniki: Oddajniki Bluetooth; Oddajniki FM
fi: Elektroniikka > Audio > Audiokomponentit > Audiolähettimet: Bluetooth-lähettimet; FM-lähettimet
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Ήχος > Συστατικά ήχου > Πομποί ήχου: Πομποί Bluetooth; Πομποί FM
lt-LT: Elektronika > Garsas > Garso komponentai > Garso siųstuvai: „Bluetooth“ siųstuvai; FM siųstuvai
hr-HR: Elektronika > Audio > Audio dijelovi > Audio odašiljači: Bluetooth odašiljači; Radijski odašiljači
en: Electronics > Audio > Audio Components > Audio Transmitters: Bluetooth Transmitters; FM Transmitters
de: Elektronik > Audio > Audiokomponenten > Audiotransmitter: Bluetooth-Sender; FM-Transmitter
cs: Elektronika > Zvuk > Zvukové komponenty > Zařízení pro přenos zvuku: Vysílače Bluetooth; FM vysílače
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Áudio > Componentes para equipamentos de áudio > Transmissores de áudio: Transmissores bluetooth; Transmissores FM
es: Electrónica > Audio > Equipo de sonido > Transmisores de audio: Transmisores Bluetooth; Transmisores FM
sk-SK: Elektronika > Zvukové zariadenia > Audio komponenty > Zvukové vysielače: Bluetooth vysielače; FM vysielače
tr: Elektronik > Ses > Ses Bileşenleri > Ses Vericileri: Bluetooth Vericiler; FM Vericiler
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Âm thanh > Bộ phận thiết bị âm thanh > Bộ truyền âm thanh: Thiết bị truyền qua bluetooth; Bộ phát sóng FM
ja: 電子機器 > オーディオ > オーディオ機器 > オーディオトランスミッター: Bluetoothトランスミッター; FMトランスミッター
ko: 전자기기 > 오디오 > 오디오 구성품 > 오디오 송신기: 블루투스 송신기; FM 송신기
bg-BG: Електроника > Aудио > Аудиокомпоненти > Аудиопредаватели: Bluetooth предаватели; FM предаватели
nl: Elektronica > Audio > Audiocomponenten > Audiozenders: Bluetooth-toestellen; FM-zenders